Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 7
COMMITTEE ON LEGAL SERVICES - REVISOR OF STATUTES

2-3-701. Function of committee - statute revision.

With respect to statute revision, it is the function of the committee on legal services:

Repealed.

To supervise and direct the activities of the revisor; and to exercise the powers and to perform the duties and functions prescribed in articles 4 and 5 of this title, concerning the preparation and publication of the statutes of this state and other materials, and as prescribed in part 2 of article 70 of title 24, C.R.S., concerning the preparation and publication of the session laws of this state.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 465, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-11.

L. 88:

(1)(a) repealed, p. 313, § 24, effective May 23.

2-3-702. Revisor of statutes - duties.

The revisor shall compile, edit, arrange, and prepare for publication the declaration of independence, the constitutions of the United States and the state of Colorado, the act admitting Colorado into the union, and all laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, together with a complete index thereto and comparative tables of such statutes with prior compilations. The statutory laws shall be arranged into appropriate and convenient volumes, titles, chapters, articles, and sections, so collated and in such form as the committee directs. At the end of each section, reference shall be made to the statutory history of such section. Annotations of decisions of the supreme court of the United States, the supreme court of the state of Colorado, and such other state and federal courts as are appropriate, construing, applying, or interpreting each section, or relating to the subject matter thereof, and such other matter as the committee deems advisable or advantageous shall also be prepared for publication with such statutory laws.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 465, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-12.

2-3-702.5. Directive to the revisor of statutes - changes in arrangement - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1192), ch. 83, p. 212, § 1, effective April 14.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2018. (See L. 2016, p. 212.)

2-3-703. Revision - editorial work.

In the course of collating, compiling, editing, arranging, and preparing such statutes, the revisor, with the approval of the committee, shall adopt a uniform system of punctuation, capitalization, numbering, and wording; eliminate all obsolete and redundant words; correct obvious errors and inconsistencies; eliminate duplications and laws repealed directly or by implication; correct defective section structure in arrangement of the subject matter of existing statutes; and clarify existing laws and such other similar matter as the committee directs. The foregoing duties shall be performed in such form and manner as to preserve the intent, effect, and meaning of any and every such statute revised.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 466, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-13.

Cross references:

For preparation of Colorado Revised Statutes, see § 2-5-103; for legislative construction not based on editorial matters, see § 2-5-113 (4).

2-3-704. Revisor to aid in bill drafting. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 466, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-14.

L. 88:

Entire section repealed, p. 313, § 24, effective May 23.

2-3-705. Distribution of statutes.

The distribution of the statutes of this state shall be in such numbers and to such offices and persons as the general assembly directs at the time of approval for publication of such statutes; but the committee shall be able to distribute such additional statutes of this state to such offices and persons as it may from time to time deem necessary.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 466, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-15.

2-3-706. Successor to committee on statute revision. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 466, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-3-16.

L. 88:

Entire section repealed, p. 313, § 24, effective May 23.